Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1595
Special nuclear material, defined.

Special nuclear material shall mean (1) plutonium, uranium 233, and uranium enriched in the isotope 233 or in the isotope 235 but does not include source material or (2) any material artificially enriched by any of the foregoing, but shall not include source material.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 18.